Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-105
Petition; bond; requirements.

The petitioners must accompany the petition with a good and sufficient bond, to be approved by the county board, in double the amount of the probable cost of organizing such district, conditioned that the bondsmen will pay all costs in case such organization shall not be effected.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 2, p. 270;

Laws 1903, c. 121, § 1, p. 616;

Laws 1909, c. 155, § 1, p. 559;

R.S.1913, § 3458;

Laws 1917, c. 81, § 1, p. 192;

C.S.1922, § 2858;

C.S.1929, § 46-102;

Laws 1933, c. 87, § 1, p. 356;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-102;

R.S.1943, § 46-105.